Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1256
Collision, accident, or other casualty; commission; Nebraska State Patrol; duties.

(1) In the case of collision, accident, or other casualty involving a vessel, the operator thereof, if the collision, accident, or other casualty results in death, a missing person, or injury to a person or damage to property in excess of five hundred dollars, shall file with the commission a full description of the collision, accident, or other casualty, including such information and within such time limit as the commission may by regulation require.

(2) The commission or any other law enforcement agency shall notify the Nebraska State Patrol as soon as practicable in any cases of collision, accident, or other casualty involving a vessel, when the collision, accident, or other casualty results in death, a missing person, or life-threatening injury to a person.

(3) The Nebraska State Patrol shall collaborate with the commission or any other law enforcement agency in any investigations pursuant to this section.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 56;

Laws 2001, LB 131, § 6;

Laws 2003, LB 305, § 25.